Utah statutes.
41-1a-210.   Examination of registration records and indices of stolen and recovered vehicles.

The division upon receiving application for original registration of a vehicle shall first check the identification number shown in the application against the indices of registered vehicles and against indices of stolen and recovered vehicles.

